src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/ia/hyphenation/hyph_ia.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.ch2
.de4s
.in1
.se4i
a1a
a1b
a2b1l
a3b4lo
a1ca
a1ce
a1ch
a4ch2r
a1co
a1c2r
a1cu
a1d
1a2d1m
1a2d1v
ae1
a1el
ae1ro3
a1g
a4g3e1d
a1ge
1a2g1g
a1h
a1i1c
a1is
a1i1v
a1j
a1k
a1la
a1le
al3e1i
a1lo
a1lu
a1m
3ani1m
a1ni
an4s1p
an1s
a1o
a1p
a1q
a1ra
a1ri
a1ro
a1ru
a1ry
a1s2h
3asth
as1t
a1t
aty1r4
aty1
a1v
a1w
a1z
1ba
2b1b
b3bo
b1c
2b1d
1be
b1h
1bi
bi4s3a
b1j
b1lu
b2ly
b1m
b1n
1bo
b1p
1b2r
2b1s2
b1t
1bu
bu1e
bu1i
b1v
ca1i
2c1c
c1d
4c3en1n2
1ch2r
2ch1s
2ch1t
1chu
1ci
2c1k
1c2l
2c1m
co4c2l
co1c
co3p2
c1q
c2r
c1s2
2c1t
ctro3
ct2r
cu1a
cu1e
cu1i
1cy
cy4ne
cy1r2
c1z
1da
2d1d
1de
de4ru
de1s3e
de4s3o
de4su
2d1g
d1h2e
dia3s4
di1a
di3p4t
di1p
di4sa
di4s3e
di4si
di4so
di4s3u
2d1j
2d1m
1do
do4l3a
do1l
4d3o2s1m
d2r
dro3s4
du1a
du1e
du1i
2d1v
dy2s
e1a
e2au
e1b
e1ca
e1ce
e3ch2e
e3chi
e1co
e1c2r
e1cu
e1d
e1e
e1f
1e2f1f
e1g
e1h
e1i
e1j
e1k
e1la
e1le
e1lo
e2l3o1d
e4l3om
e1lu
e1m
e4m3a1g
e1ma
2en1l
eno3p4
e1no
e1o
eo3g2
eo3p2
e1q
e1ra
e1ri
e1ro
4ero1g
ero3p4
e1ru
er3ur
e1ry
es4e1m
e1se
e2s1t
es3u1e
e1su
e1t
eu1
eu4ce
e1un
e1v
e1w
1fa
2f1f
2f1h
1fi
1f2l
1fo
1f2r
f1t
1fu
1ga
2g1d
1ge
4g3evi
ge1v
2g1g
1gi
4g3i1ma
gi1m
g2l
2g1m
2g1n
1go
1g2r
2g1s2
1gu1
gym2
gy2m1n3
gy4na
gy4r3a
gy1r
2g1z
h2e
hec2
he2c1t3
he3ur
heu1
h3lo1c
2h1m
h1n
ho3g2
ho3p2
ho3rh
h2r
h1s
h1t
i1a
ia4l3a
i1b2
i1c
i1d
i1do3
ido1p4
i1e
i1f
i1g
i1h
i1i
i1k
i1l
i1m
i4ma1d
i1ma
1i2m1b
1in1f
1in1r
in1s2
1in1v
i1o1
io3g2
ios2
io2x
i1p
i1q
i1ra
i1ri
i1ro
iro3p4
ir3ur
is3ac
i1sa
is3as
is3au
is3e1q
i1se
is3es
is3i1l
i1si
is3in
i3s4ph
is1p
i1t
i1u
i1v
i1z
ka4le
ke1
kra1
4l3al1g
4l3ar1c
l1b
2l1c
2l1d
le3ch
le4i1d
le1i
2l1f
l1g
2l1h
1li
2l1k
2l1l
l2l3ur
2l1m
l4m3o1d
l1mo
l1n
2lo1d
l3o1do
4lo1pi
lo1p
2l1p
l1q
2l1s2
2l1t
l4t3un
lu1e
lu1i
2lur
2l1v
1ly
ly3ch1
1ma
2m1b
m1c
1me
me3ch
me4s3e
m1f
1mi
mi3p2
mi1s4i
m1j
m1l
2m1m
mme4n3
m1me
2m1n
mn3a1m
m1na
mn3as
m1no1
mn3o1b
mn3o1p
1mo
4m3o1ny
mo3p2
mo3r1r
mos4p
mo3s4t
2m1p
m3p1s
m1s2
1mu
2m1v
1my
my4r1r
my1r
1na
n1ae1
n3al1g
n3a1ni
n1a2p
n1au
n1b
n1c
2n1d
1ne
n1e1q
n1ex
n1f
n1g
n1h
1ni
n1i1q
ni3s1p
n2i1t
n1j
n1l
n1m
n1n2
1no
nob4l
no1b
n3o3s4p
n1ox
n1q
n1r
n1s
n4s3i1e
n1si
n4sir
n2s1l
ns2t
n1t
n4t3a1h
n4t3a1p
1nu
nu1a
nu1e
nu1i
n1v
1ny
n1z
o1a
o1b
ob3lo
1o2b1s2
o1c
oc3le
o1c2l
o1d
o1e
o1f
o1g
o1h
o1i
o1j
o1l
om4na
o2m1n
o1n2a
o1no1
onos4
on1s2
o1o
o1p
o1q
o1ra
o1ri
o1ro
or4rh
or1r
o1ru
o1s2l
o2s4po
os1p
o1t
o4t3ac
oto3s4
ou1
o1ug
o1v
oy1
o1z
1pa
pan3s
1pe
1ph
1pi
1p2l
pl4a
4pl3o1p
p1n
p2n1a
p2ne
1po
2p1p
p4p3i1a
p1pi
1p2r
2p1s
p4s3o1d
p1so
3p2sy
2p1t
1pu
pu1b2
2pu1e
pu1i
p2yl1
py4lo
qu2
qua4n
4r3al1g
2ra1q
4r3ar1c
r1b
r1c
2r1d
1re
re3ch
re1gi3
re1g
4r3en1n2
re3u1t
reu1
r1f
2r1g
1rhi
r1hu
r3hyd
r1j
r1l
2r1m
r1n
r1p
r1q
r1r
r2r3a1q
r1s2
2r1t
ru1a
ru1e
ru1i
r1v
r1w
ry4s1e
r1z
1sa
s3a1bu
sa1b
4s3a2c1t
2s1af
s3a1g2r
sa1g
s3an1n2
2s1a1p
2s1a1q
s3a2r1g
s3a2r1m
s3a2r1t
2s1b
1s2c
scle4
s1c2l
s1d
1se
2s1f
2s1g
s1h
1si
4s3i1ge
si1g
s3i1ro
s1j
1sk
s1l
s4la1v
2s1m
s1n
1so
so1b2
s3o1be
s3obl
s3o2c1c
so1c
s3o1do
so1d
s3o2r1d
s3o2r1g
s3o2s1s2
2s1ox
s1p
2s1pa
spa4i
2s1p2l
2s1po
s1q
s1r
2s1s2
s3sa
s1t
1su
su1a
su4ba
su4b2r
su1e
su1i
2s1un
2s1v
1sy
4t3al1g
4t3a2m1b
ta1m
4t3a2r1t
2t1d
4t3e1co
2t1f
2t1g
th1l
2t2h1m
ti3s4p
t1l
2t1m
t1mo1
to3s4p
4t3ox1y1
2t1p
t2r
4tr3or
2t1s
2t1t
tu1a
tu1e
tu1i
tu4s3a
ty1
2t1z
u3a1ni
u1as
u1a1v
ub3al
u1ba
ub1l
ub3ro
u1b2r
u1ca
u1ce
uc3e1m
u1ch
u1co
u1c2r
u1cu
u1d
u1el
u1i1b2
u1i1c
u1la
u1le
u1lo
u1o1
u1ra
3ur1go
u2r1g
u1ri
u1ro
u1ru
u2s1t
u1t
u1u
u1v
va1i
vi3ru
2vn
v2r
w2n1
x1a
x1c
x1e
x1h
x1i
x1o
x1p
x1q
x1s2
x1t
x1u
xu1a
x1y1
1x2yl
y1a
y1b
yc1a
y1ce
ych1
y1co
yc4t3a
y2c1t
yd2r1
y1e
y1g
y1h
y1i
2yl
y3lac
yl3a1m
y1le
y1lo
yn3an
y1na
yn3e1g
y1ne
y1o
y1po1
ypos4
y1r
yro1
yros4
y1s1e
y1t
y1u
y1z
ze1
1zi
1zu1
2z1z
.a8l8c9u8n.
.a2l1c
.a8l8c9u9n8i8s9s8i9m8e.
.alcu1ni
.alcuni2s1s2
.alcunis1si
.alcunissi1m
.alcunissi1me
.a8l8c9u8n9m8e8n9t8e.
.alcun1m
.alcun1me
.alcunmen1t
.a9l8i8c9u8n.
.a1li
.ali1c
.a9l8i8c9u9n8i8s9s8i9m8e.
.alicu1ni
.alicuni2s1s2
.alicunis1si
.alicunissi1m
.alicunissi1me
.a9l8i8c9u8n9m8e8n9t8e.
.alicun1m
.alicun1me
.alicunmen1t
.m8o8s9l8e8m.
.mo1s2l
.mosle1m
.q8u8a8l8c9u8n.
.qu2
.qua2l1c
.q8u8a8l8c9u9n8i8s9s8i9m8e.
.qualcu1ni
.qualcuni2s1s2
.qualcunis1si
.qualcunissi1m
.qualcunissi1me
.q8u8a8l8c9u8n9m8e8n9t8e.
.qualcun1m
.qualcun1me
.qualcunmen1t
